fi: Rakentaminen > Työkalujen lisätarvikkeet > Poikien asusteet: Nakertajan kärjet
nb: Maskinvare > Verktøytilbehør > Skjæretilbehør: Nibblingsformer
ro-RO: Feronerie > Accesorii pentru unelte > Accesorii cutter: Matrițe pentru mașina de ștanțat
ja: DIY用品 > 工具関連用品 > カッター関連用品: ニブラー用ダイス
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 工具配件 > 切割机配件: 冲剪模具
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Werkzeugzubehör > Schneidwerkzeug-Zubehör: Nibbelmaschinenstempel
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Nástroje a nářadí – příslušenství > Střihací a řezací nástroje – příslušenství: Raznice
pt-PT: Equipamento > Acessórios de ferramentas > Acessórios de cortador: Matrizes e punções de corte
bg-BG: Железария > Аксесоари за инструменти > Аксесоари за щанцова ножица: Накрайници за ниблер
pl: Sprzęt > Akcesoria do narzędzi > Akcesoria do nożyc: Noże do wycinarek
vi: Phần cứng > Phụ kiện dụng cụ > Phụ kiện máy cắt: Khuôn máy cắt
zh-TW: 硬體 > 工具配件 > 切割用具配件: 壓縮式電剪衝模
fr: Quincaillerie > Accessoires d’outils > Accessoires pour outils de coupe: Matrices pour grignoteuses
da: Isenkram > Værktøj – tilbehør > Fræsertilbehør: Stempel til pladestanser
hu: Hardver > Szerszám-kiegészítők > Vágókiegészítők: Nibbler fejek
en: Hardware > Tool Accessories > Cutter Accessories: Nibbler Dies
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Gereedschapaccessoires > Accessoires voor snijmachines: Matrijzen voor knabbelscharen
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > อุปกรณ์เครื่องมือ > อุปกรณ์ครื่องตัด: แม่พิมพ์นิบเบลอร์
es: Bricolaje > Accesorios para herramientas > Accesorios para cúteres: Perfiles para mordiscadoras
tr: Hırdavat > Alet Aksesuarları > Kesici Aksesuarları: Sac Kesici Kalıpları
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Аксессуары для инструментов > Аксессуары для режущих инструментов: Пуансоны и матрицы для вырубных ножниц
sk-SK: Náradie > Náradie a príslušenstvo > Príslušenstvo pre rezačky: Elektrický prestrihovač
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Accessori per attrezzi > Accessori per taglierine: Pinze di serraggio con dado
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Αξεσουάρ εργαλείων > Αξεσουάρ κοπτικών ειδών: Κοπτικά κεφαλών κοπής
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Dodatki za orodje > Dodatki za rezalnike: Matice za rezalnik
sv: Metallprodukter > Verktygstillbehör > Tillbehör till skärare: Matriser för nibblare
pt-BR: Ferragens > Acessórios para ferramentas > Acessórios de corte: Ponteiras para tesouras de punção
hr-HR: Željezarija > Dodaci za alat > Pribor za rezače: Matrice škara za lim
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Įrankių priedai > Pjoviklių priedai: Skardos žirklių galvutės
ko: 철물 > 공구 부대용품 > 절단기 부대용품: 니블러 다이